Tennessee, session 114, HB1798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-21-901(a)(2)(B)(ii), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(ii) For purposes of the payment of fees for garnishments as provided in this
subdivision (a)(2)(B), all garnishments are deemed to be original garnishments and the
sheriff or other person authorized by law to serve garnishments is entitled to the fee
provided for in this subdivision (a)(2)(B) for each such garnishment served. The sheriff
or other authorized person may demand that the fee for performing service of the
garnishment be paid in advance of such performance.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1798
010409
- 1 -